District of Columbia statutes.
1-619.01

Authority to grant awards.

(a)

The Mayor and the District of Columbia Board of Education shall issue rules and regulations authorizing the granting of cash and honorary awards to employees for their suggestions, inventions, superior accomplishments, length of service, and other meritorious efforts which contribute to the efficiency, economy, or otherwise improve the operation of the District government.

(b)

The Mayor is authorized to make honorary awards to citizens who make significant contributions to the public good, or who submit ideas or inventions which materially benefit the District of Columbia.

(c)

Awards to employees of the District government pursuant to this subchapter may include tangible items with a monetary value of no more than $50 and time off without loss of pay or charge to leave.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1901, 25 DCR 5740
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(u)(1), 45 DCR 2464
This section is referenced in § 1-619.02 and § 2-360.01.
1981 Ed., § 1-620.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-349.1.
Applicability of § 101(u) of D.C. Law 12-124: Section 401(c) of D.C. Law 12-124, as amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 12- 264, provided that § 101(h), (l), (m), (n), (o)(2) through (5), (q), (r), (t), (u), (w), and (y) of the act shall apply as of October 21, 1998.
Extension of Retirement Awards Program Pursuant to Sections 1902.1(a)(6) and 1904.7 of Chapter 19, Incentive Awards, of Title 6 of the District of Columbia, see Mayor’s Order 2010-38, February 26, 2010 ( 57 DCR 1788).